Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1341.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3571(b)(2)(ii) of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 3571. Commonwealth portion of fines, etc.* * *(b) Vehicle offenses.--* * *(2) Except as provided in paragraphs (4) and (5), when prosecution under any other provision of Title 75 (relating to vehicles) is the result of State Police action, all of the following apply:* * *(ii) Distribution of revenue is as follows:(A) [Only a municipality that has a population 123456789101112131415161718 of not more than 3,000 or that provides at least 40 hours per week of local police services through a municipal police department, participation in a regional police department or contracts with other municipal or regional police for police services may receive revenue under subparagraph (i).] Only municipalities that provide at least 40 hours per week of local police services through a municipal police department, participation in a regional police department or contracts with other municipal or regional police for police services may receive revenue under subparagraph (i).(B) Revenue that is not paid to municipalities under clause (A) shall be transferred to the Pennsylvania [State Police for cadet classes.] Commission on Crime and Delinquency for distribution to public or private grant programs that support the regionalization and accreditation of police departments in this Commonwealth.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1341PN1530 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021